Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1104
Promoting gambling, third degree; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of promoting gambling in the third degree if he or she knowingly participates in unlawful gambling as a player by betting less than five hundred dollars in any one day.

(2) Promoting gambling in the third degree is a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 220;

Laws 1979, LB 152, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 52.